Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 275 Limited Liability Companies
275.260.
Member’s transferable interest subject to charging order.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which the judgment creditor of a member or the assignee of a member may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s limited liability company interest.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by a judgment creditor of a member or a member’s assignee, a court may charge the judgment debtor’s interest in the limited liability company with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee and shall have no right to participate in the management or to cause the dissolution of the limited liability company. The court may appoint a receiver of the share of the distributions due or to become due to the judgment debtor in respect of the limited liability company interest and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries the judgment debtor might have made or which the circumstances of the case may require to give effect to the charging order.

A charging order constitutes a lien on and the right to receive distributions made with respect to the judgment debtor’s limited liability company interest. A charging order does not of itself constitute an assignment of the limited liability company interest.

The court may order a foreclosure upon the limited liability company interest subject to the charging order at any time. The purchaser of the limited liability company interest at the foreclosure sale has the rights of an assignee. At any time before foreclosure, the charged limited liability company interest may be redeemed:

By the judgment debtor;

With property other than limited liability company property, by one (1) or more of the other members; and

With limited liability company property, by the limited liability company with the consent of all members whose interest are not so charged.

This section does not deprive a member or a member’s assignee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the member’s or assignee’s limited liability company interest.

The limited liability company is not a necessary party to an application for a charging order. Service of the charging order on a limited liability company may be made by the court granting the charging order or as the court should otherwise direct.

This section does not apply to the enforcement of a judgment by a limited liability company against a member of that company.

This section does apply to the issuance of a charging order against the interest of a member or assignee of a member of a foreign limited liability company.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
52, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, §
35, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, §
117, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 117, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, § 35, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 29, § 23, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 193, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.265.
Assignee of an interest as a member of the company.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, an assignee of a limited liability company interest shall become a member only if a majority-in-interest of the members consent. The consent of a member may be evidenced in any manner specified in writing in an operating agreement, but in the absence of specification, consent shall be evidenced by one (1) or more written instruments, dated and signed by the requisite members. Except as otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, the assignor of a limited liability company interest shall not participate in the vote, approval, or consent of the admission of the assignee as a member.

An assignee who becomes a member shall have, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers and shall be subject to the restrictions and liabilities of a member under the articles of organization, any written operating agreement, and this chapter. An assignee who becomes a member also shall be liable for any obligations of his or her assignor to make contributions under KRS

275.200

. However, the assignee shall not be obligated for liabilities of which the assignee had no knowledge at the time he or she became a member and which could not be ascertained from the articles of organization or any written operating agreement.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, the assignor shall not be released from his or her liability to the limited liability company under KRS

275.200

, whether or not an assignee of a limited liability company interest becomes a member.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, a member who assigns his or her entire limited liability company interest shall cease to be a member or to have the power to exercise any rights of the member when the assignee becomes a member with respect to the entire assigned interest.

Unless otherwise set forth in the operating agreement, a successor in interest to a member who is disassociated from the limited liability company shall have the rights and obligations of an assignee with respect to the member’s interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 53, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 36, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 133, § 36, effective July 15, 2010.

275.270.
Member’s legal representative to have rights of assignee if member dies or is declared incompetent. [Repealed.]

275.275.
Admission to membership in company.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a person may become a member in a limited liability company:

In the case of the person acquiring a limited liability company interest directly from a limited liability company, upon compliance with an operating agreement or, if an operating agreement does not so provide in writing, upon the written consent of all members; and

In the case of an assignee of the limited liability company interest, as provided in KRS

275.255

and

275.265

.

The effective time of admission of a member to a limited liability company shall be the later of:

The date the limited liability company is formed;

The time provided in the operating agreement or, if no time is provided, when the person’s admission is reflected in the records of the limited liability company; or

The time the member is admitted under KRS 275.285(4).

Upon becoming a member in a limited liability company, the member is bound by and a party to the operating agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 55, effective July 15, 1994; 2011, ch. 29, § 14, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 108, effective July 12, 2012.

275.280.
Cessation of membership.

A person shall disassociate from and cease to be a member of a limited liability company upon the occurrence of one (1) or more of the following events:

Subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, the member withdraws by voluntary act from the limited liability company;

The member ceases to be a member of the limited liability company as provided in KRS

275.265

;

The member is removed as a member:

In accordance with a written operating agreement;

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, if after an assignment there is at least one (1) other member, when the member assigns all of the member’s limited liability company interest that may be unilaterally assigned, upon receipt of the written consent of a majority- in-interest of the members who have not assigned their interest; or

If after the assignment there are no other members, upon the effective time and date of the assignment;

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement or by written consent of majority-in-interest of the members, at the time the member:

Makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

Files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy;

Is adjudicated bankrupt or insolvent;

Files a petition or answer seeking for the member any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation;

Files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegations of a petition filed against the member in any proceeding of this nature; or

Seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the member or of all or any substantial part of the member’s property;

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement or by written consent of a majority-in-interest of the members remaining at the time, if within one hundred twenty (120) days after the commencement of any proceeding against the member seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within one hundred twenty (120) days after the appointment without the member’s consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the member, or of all or any substantial part of the member’s properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed or within one hundred twenty (120) days after the expiration of any stay, the appointment is not vacated;

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement or by written consent of a majority-in-interest of the members remaining at the time, in the case of a member that is an individual:

The member’s death; or

The entry of an order by a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicating the member incompetent to manage his or her person or estate;

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement or by written consent of a majority-in-interest of the members remaining at the time, in the case of a member that is a trust or is acting as a member by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the termination of the trust, but not merely the substitution of a new trustee;

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement or by written consent of a majority-in-interest of the members remaining at the time, in the case of a member that is a separate limited liability company, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of the separate limited liability company;

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement or by written consent of the majority-in-interest of the members remaining at the time, in the case of a member that is a corporation, the filing of articles of dissolution or the equivalent for the corporation or the revocation of its articles of incorporation and the lapse of ninety (90) days after notice to the corporation of revocation without a reinstatement of its articles of incorporation; or

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement or by written consent of a majority-in-interest of the members remaining at the time, in the case of an estate, the distribution by the fiduciary of the estate’s entire interest in the limited liability company.

The members may provide in a written operating agreement for other events the occurrence of which shall result in a person ceasing to be a member of the limited liability company.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement:

In a member-managed limited liability company a member may resign from a limited liability company upon thirty (30) days” prior written notice to the limited liability company; and

In a manager-managed limited liability company, a member may not resign without the consent of all other members.

Upon the effective date of the resignation, the resigning member shall be dissociated from and cease to be a member of the limited liability company and shall be with respect to the resigning member’s limited liability company interest an assignee thereof.

The successor-in-interest of a disassociated member shall be an assignee.

Except as set forth in a written operating agreement, the dissociation of a member does not entitle the former member or any assignee thereof to any distribution.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 56, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 37, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 133, § 37, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 29, § 15, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 109, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 193, § 14, effective June 29, 2017.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Rutledge & Honabach, Kentucky Business Entity Laws: The 2010 Amendments, Vol. 74, No. 5, September 2010, Ky. Bench & Bar 6.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.285.
Dissolution of company.

A limited liability company shall be dissolved, and it shall commence to wind up its affairs upon the happening of the first to occur of the following:

The expiration of the term of the limited liability company set forth in the articles of organization, if any;

Upon the occurrence of events specified in the articles of organization or a written operating agreement;

Unless otherwise set forth in the operating agreement, the written consent of all of the members of a limited liability company;

There are no remaining members, except that the limited liability company shall not be dissolved and its affairs shall not be wound up when:

A member is admitted to the limited liability company in the manner provided for in a written operating agreement, effective as of the occurrence of the event that terminated the continued membership of the last remaining member; or

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, within ninety (90) days after the occurrence of the event that terminated the continued membership of the last remaining member, the successor-in-interest of the last remaining member agrees in writing to continue the limited liability company and to the admission of the successor-in-interest of that member or its designee to the limited liability company as a member, effective as of the occurrence of the event that terminated the continued membership of the last remaining member;

Entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under KRS

275.290

; or

Filing of a certificate of dissolution by the Secretary of State under KRS

14A.7-020

; but

If a nonprofit limited liability company does not have members, subsection (4) of this section shall not apply.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
57, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, §
38, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, §
118, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 118, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 144, effective January 1, 2011; 2015 ch. 34, § 46, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

275.290.
Judicial dissolution.

The Circuit Court for the county in which the principal office of the limited liability company is located, or, if none, in the county of the registered office, may dissolve a limited liability company in a proceeding by a member if it is established that it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business of the limited liability company in conformity with the operating agreement.

If after a hearing the court determines that one (1) or more grounds for judicial dissolution exist, it may enter a decree of dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Secretary of State, who shall file it. The dissolution shall be effective upon the filing of the decree by the Secretary of State or a later date as is specified in the decree.

After entering the decree of dissolution, the court shall direct the winding up and liquidation of the limited liability company’s business and affairs in accordance with KRS

275.300

and the notification of claimants in accordance with KRS

275.320

and

275.325

.

The effect of dissolution under this section shall be as provided in KRS 275.300(2) and (3).

After dissolution pursuant to KRS

275.285

or otherwise, upon application of a limited liability company, a member, or a creditor of the company, the appropriate court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of the company, including the appointment of a person to wind up the company’s activities, if:

After a reasonable time, the company has not wound up its activities; or

The applicant establishes other good cause.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 58, effective July 15, 1994; 2011, ch. 29, § 16, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 110, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 34, § 76, effective June 24, 2015.

275.295.
Administrative dissolution — Reinstatement. [Repealed.]

275.300.
Winding up of affairs — Effect of dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in a written operating agreement the business or affairs of the limited liability company may be wound up:

By the members or managers who have authority pursuant to KRS

275.165

to manage the limited liability company prior to dissolution; or

If one (1) or more of the members or managers have engaged in wrongful conduct, or upon other cause shown, by the Circuit Court for the county in which the principal office of the limited liability company is located or in which the registered office of the limited liability company is located, on application of any member, any member’s legal representative, or assignee.

A dissolved limited liability company shall continue its existence but shall not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its members;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities, including as appropriate entering into agreements with creditors for the satisfaction thereof;

Distributing its remaining property among its members and assignees in proportion to their rights to share therein; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Except as otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, dissolution of a limited liability company shall not:

Transfer title to the limited liability company’s property;

Prevent transfer of a limited liability company interest, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for the limited liability company restricting the transfer of the limited liability company’s interest;

Subject its members or managers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed herein;

Amend the operating agreement or otherwise change quorum or voting requirements for its members or managers, provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its members or managers, or provisions for amending the operating agreement, or terminate contribution obligations.

Dissolution of a limited liability company shall not:

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the limited liability company in its name;

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the limited liability company on the effective date of dissolution;

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the limited liability company;

Alter the obligations and responsibilities of the limited liability company as prescribed by applicable federal or state law with regard to the filing or examination of all federal and state tax returns or the payment, assessment, or collection of any federal or state tax due with respect to those returns; or

Abate or suspend KRS 275.150(1).

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
60, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
120, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 120, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, § 39, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 81, § 111, effective July 12, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 133, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together.

275.305.
Binding acts of member or manager — Notice of dissolution.

Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, after dissolution of the limited liability company, each member or manager having authority to wind up the limited liability company’s business and affairs may bind the limited liability company:

By any act appropriate for winding up the limited liability company’s affairs or completing transactions unfinished at dissolution; and

By any other act that would have bound the limited liability company if it had not been dissolved, if the other party to the transaction did not have notice of the dissolution.

The filing of articles of dissolution pursuant to KRS

275.315

, the entry of a decree of dissolution pursuant to KRS

275.290

, or the filing of a certificate of dissolution pursuant to KRS

14A.7-020

shall be presumed to constitute notice of dissolution for purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section.

An act of a member or manager which is not binding on the limited liability company pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be binding if it is otherwise authorized by the limited liability company.

An act of a member or manager which would be binding under subsection (1) of this section, or would be otherwise authorized but which is in contravention of a restriction on authority, shall not bind the limited liability company to persons having knowledge of the restriction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 61, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 151, § 145, effective January 1, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.310.
Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited liability company, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

First, payment or adequate provisions for payment shall be made to creditors, including, to the extent permitted by law, members who are creditors in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited liability company;

Second, unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, to members and assignees in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under KRS

275.210

; and

Third, unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, to members and assignees for the return of their contributions; and

Fourth, unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, to members and assignees in proportion to their respective rights to share in distributions from the limited liability company prior to dissolution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 62, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 57, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 133, § 40, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge & Honabach, Kentucky Business Entity Laws: The 2010 Amendments, Vol. 74, No. 5, September 2010, Ky. Bench & Bar 6.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.315.
Articles of dissolution.

After the dissolution of the limited liability company pursuant to KRS 275.285(2), (3), or (4), the limited liability company shall file articles of dissolution with the Secretary of State which set forth:

The name of the limited liability company;

A statement of the subsection of KRS

275.285

pursuant to which the limited liability company has dissolved;

The effective date, which shall be a date certain, of the dissolution; and

Any other information the members or managers filing the articles of dissolution shall deem proper.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
63, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
121, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 121, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 29, § 17, effective June 8, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.320.
Disposition of claims.

Upon dissolution pursuant to KRS

275.285

, a limited liability company may dispose of the known claims against it by filing, if required, articles of dissolution pursuant to KRS

275.315

and by following the procedures described in this section.

The limited liability company shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after the effective date of dissolution. The written notice shall:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days after the later of the date of the written notice, if required, or the filing of articles of dissolution pursuant to KRS

275.315

, by which the limited liability company must receive the claim; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against the limited liability company shall be barred:

If a claimant who is given written notice under subsection (2) of this section does not deliver the claim to the limited liability company by the deadline;

If a claimant whose claim was rejected by the limited liability company does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within ninety (90) days after the date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” shall not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 64, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.325.
Publication of notice of dissolution — Barred claims — Enforceable claims.

A dissolved limited liability company may publish notice of its dissolution pursuant to this section.

The notice shall:

Be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the limited liability company’s principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is or was last located;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the limited liability company will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within two (2) years, or five (5) years for a professional limited liability company, after the publication of the notice.

If the dissolved limited liability company publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (2) of this section and, if required, files articles of dissolution pursuant to KRS

275.315

, the claim of each of the following claimants shall be barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the limited liability company within two (2) years, or five (5) years for a professional limited liability company, after the later of publication date of the newspaper notice or the filing of the articles of dissolution pursuant to KRS

275.315

, the filing of a certificate of dissolution by the Secretary of State pursuant to KRS

14A.7-020

, or the filing of a decree of judicial dissolution by the Secretary of State pursuant to KRS 275.290(2):

A claimant who did not receive written notice under KRS

275.320

;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the limited liability company but not acted on;

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim may be enforced under this section:

Against the limited liability company, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a member of the limited liability company to the extent of his pro rata share of the claim or the assets of the limited liability company distributed to him in liquidation, whichever is less, but a member’s total liability for all claims under this section shall not exceed the total amount of assets, less liabilities assumed or taken subject to, distributed to him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 65, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 151, § 146, effective January 1, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.330.
Use of company’s name in judicial actions.

Suit may be brought by or against the limited liability company in its own name.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 66, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.335.
Persons who may sue in company’s name — Recording of votes — Prosecution and settlement of suits.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, a suit on behalf of the limited liability company may be brought in the name of the company only by:

One (1) or more members of the company, who are authorized to sue by the vote of more than one half (1/2) of the number of members eligible to vote thereon; or

One (1) or more managers of the limited liability company, if the articles of organization vest management of the company in one (1) or more managers, who are authorized to do so by the vote of more than one-half (1/2) of the number of managers eligible to vote.

Subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be applicable irrespective of whether the articles of organization vest management of the limited liability company in one (1) or more managers.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, in any vote of the members or managers pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the vote of any member or manager who has an interest in the outcome of the suit that is adverse to the interest of the limited liability company shall be excluded.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, any vote pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be set forth in a record signed or otherwise approved by each member or manager voting in favor of bringing suit on behalf of the limited liability company.

Except as otherwise provided in a writing approved in accordance with subsection (1) of this section that would also be sufficient to amend the operating agreement pursuant to the terms of the written operating agreement or, in the absence of a provision governing amendment of the operating agreement, the prosecution and settlement of any suit brought pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be pursuant to KRS

275.175

.

Every member and manager of a limited liability company shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any action by, in the name of, or on behalf of the limited liability company or for any violation of a duty owed the limited liability company or a member thereof.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 67, effective July 15, 1994; 2012, ch. 81, § 112, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 34, § 54, effective June 24, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge & Honabach, Kentucky Business Entity Laws: The 2010 Amendments, Vol. 74, No. 5, September 2010, Ky. Bench & Bar 6.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.337.
Derivative actions.

A member may maintain a direct action against a limited liability company, another member, or a manager to redress an injury sustained by, or to enforce a duty owed to, the member if the member can prevail without showing an injury or breach of duty to the company.

A member may maintain a derivative action to redress an injury sustained by or enforce a duty owed to a limited liability company if:

The member shall first make a demand on the other members and, if the company is manager-managed, the managers, requesting that they cause the company to bring an action to redress the injury or enforce the right, and they do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

A demand would be futile.

A derivative action on behalf of a limited liability company shall be maintained only by a person that is a member at the time the action is commenced and who:

Was a member when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

Acquired the status as a member by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the operating agreement from a person that was a member at the time of the conduct giving rise to the action occurred.

In a derivative action on behalf of the limited liability company, the complaint shall state with particularity:

The date and content of the member’s demand and the response to the demand; or

The reason the demand should be excused as futile.

The derivative proceeding shall not be maintained if:

It appears that the person commencing the proceeding does not fairly and adequately represent the interests of the shareholder in enforcing the rights of the limited liability company; or

The person commencing the proceeding ceases to be a member in the limited liability company.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9) of this section:

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action on behalf of a limited liability company, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, are the property of the company and not of the plaintiff; and

If the plaintiff receives any proceeds or other benefits, the plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the company.

A derivative action on behalf of a limited liability company shall not be voluntarily dismissed or settled without the court’s approval.

The proper venue for a direct action under subsection (1) of this section or a derivative action shall be the Circuit Court for the county in which the company maintains its registered office and agent.

On termination of the proceeding brought pursuant to this section, the court may:

Require the plaintiff member to pay any defendant’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in defending the proceeding to the extent it finds that the proceeding or any portion thereof was commenced without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose; and

Require the limited liability company to pay the plaintiff member’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in the proceeding to the extent it finds that the proceeding has resulted in a substantial benefit to the company.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 50, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 193, § 15, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). Subsection (5) of this statute concerning when a derivative action involving a limited liability company cannot be maintained was amended in
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 188, sec. 2. New language added to subsection (5)(a) of this statute read, in part, “represent the interests of the shareholder in enforcing the rights.” In codification, the Reviser of Statutes corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1)(h) by changing the word “shareholder” to “members” since limited liability companies do not have shareholders, but rather members, to be consistent with actual practice and language used in Sections 20 and 23 of that Act.

275.340.
Effect of determination that member or manager lacks authority to sue on behalf of company. [Repealed.]

275.345.
Right of company to merge with other business entities — Exception — No right of dissent.

Unless otherwise provided in writing in a written operating agreement, and subject to any law applicable to business entities other than limited liability companies, one (1) or more limited liability companies may merge with or into one (1) or more other business entities with the limited liability company or other business entity being the surviving or resulting limited liability company or other business entity.

Rights or securities of or interests in a business entity that is a party to the merger may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property, obligations, rights, or securities of or interests in the surviving or resulting business entity or of any other business entity.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization, a written operating agreement, or a written agreement and plan of merger, no member of a limited liability company shall have the right to dissent from a merger.

A nonprofit limited liability company shall not merge with or into any business entity which is not a domestic nonprofit limited liability company or a domestic nonprofit corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
69, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
122, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 122, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 131, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Dolson, Contractual Dissenters’ Rights for Kentucky LLCs, Volume 75, No. 1, January 2011, Ky. Bench & Bar 18.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).